District of Columbia statutes.
47-1817.05

Tax credit to Qualified High Technology Companies for wages to qualified disadvantaged employees.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2000, a Qualified High Technology Company shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by § 47-1817.06 equal to 50% of the wages paid to a qualified disadvantaged employee, as defined in § 47-1817.04, during the first 24 calendar months of employment.

(b)

The credit under subsection (a) of this section shall not be allowed:

(1)

To exceed $15,000 in a taxable year for a qualified disadvantaged employee; or

(2)

If the Qualified High Technology Company accords the qualified disadvantaged employee lesser benefits or rights than it accords other employees in similar jobs.

(c)

If the amount of the credit allowable under this section exceeds the tax otherwise due from a Qualified High Technology Company, the unused amount of the credit may be carried forward for 10 years.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-256, § 203(b), 48 DCR 730

History